Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-151
Keith.

The county of Keith is bounded as follows: Commencing at the northeast corner of township sixteen, north, of range thirty-five, west, sixth principal meridian; thence south along the range line to the southeast corner of township thirteen, north, of range thirty-five, west, on the third standard parallel; thence east along the parallel to the northeast corner of township twelve, north, of range thirty-five, west; thence south three miles to the southeast corner of section thirteen, township twelve, north; thence west by section lines to the northwest corner of section nineteen, township twelve, north, of range forty-one west; thence north along the range line to the third standard parallel; thence west along said parallel to the southwest corner of section thirty-two, range forty-one, west; thence north by section lines to the northwest corner of section five, township sixteen, north, on the fourth standard parallel; thence east along said parallel to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 68, p. 225;

R.S.1913, § 864;

Laws 1921, c. 231, § 6, p. 825;

C.S.1922, § 766;

C.S.1929, § 25-153;

R.S.1943, § 22-151.